Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 1. In General

§ 9-12-101.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Economic Development Act.”

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 2.

§ 9-12-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act, the following terms have the following meanings, except where the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Board” means the board of directors of the council;

“Council” means the Wyoming business council, the body corporate created by this article;

“Federal agency” means the United States, the President of the United States, and any department, corporation, agency, or instrumentality heretofore or hereafter created, designated, or established by the United States;

“Financial aid” means:

The infusion of risk capital to persons by making investments for use in the development and exploitation of specific products;

The purchase of securities;

Royalty agreements;

Loans and loan guarantees;

Any contractual arrangement in which the council provides technological services to any person involving the development and exploitation of a specific product.

“Person” means natural persons, firms, foundations, associations, corporations, business trusts, partnerships, joint ventures, and public bodies, including but not limited to the state of Wyoming, any state, and any agency, department, institution, political subdivision or instrumentality of Wyoming or any state;

“Product” means any product, device, technique or process, which is or may be exploitable commercially and includes products, devices, techniques or processes which have advanced beyond the theoretic stage and are readily capable of being, or have been, reduced to practice but excludes pure research;

“Venture” means any contractual arrangement with any person whereby the council obtains rights from or in a product or proceeds therefrom in exchange for the granting of financial aid to the person;

“This act” means W.S.

9-12-101

through

9-12-1509

.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 2; 2003, ch. 8, § 1; ch. 211, § 2; 2005, ch. 233, § 2; 2007, ch. 181, § 2; 2009, ch. 123, § 2; 2010, ch. 113, § 2; 2018 ch. 126, § 2, effective March 14, 2018.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “9-12-804” for “9-12-603” in (a)(viii).

Laws 2005, ch. 233, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(viii) substituted “9-12-905” for “9-12-804.”

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “9-12-1203” for “9-12-905.”

The 2010 amendment,

in (a)(viii), substituted “through

9-12-1312

” for “through

9-12-1203

.”

Laws 2010, ch. 113, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2010.

The 2018 amendment,

in (a)(viii), substituted “9-12-1509” for “9-12-1312.”

Laws 2018, ch. 126, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-12-103.
Wyoming business council; creation; composition; compensation; termination; meetings; surety bonds; fiscal control.

There is created the Wyoming business council. The council is a body corporate operating as a state instrumentality operated solely for the public benefit. As such it shall have, and is hereby vested with, the powers and duties conferred in this chapter. Beginning March 1, 2022, it shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of thirteen (13) voting directors, appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The governor shall be a member and cochairman of the board, but shall not vote. The appointed directors shall have demonstrated leadership and business expertise. An equal number of directors shall be appointed to initial terms of one (1), two (2) and three (3) years. Thereafter, directors shall serve for terms of three (3) years. No appointed director shall serve more than two (2) successive three (3) year terms. If a vacancy occurs, the governor shall appoint a successor in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

. The governor may remove any board member he appoints for cause and shall remove any director who fails to attend three (3) consecutive regular meetings of the council. No appointed council member shall send a designee to attend a council meeting nor vote by proxy. The board shall select one (1) of its members to act as cochairman of the board. The board shall retain a chief executive officer. The chief executive officer serves at the pleasure of the board. All of the appointed directors shall be appointed at large and at least twelve (12) of the appointed directors shall be residents of Wyoming.

The appointed directors shall receive per diem for attending board meetings in the same amount as state legislators and shall receive no other compensation for serving on the board. The board shall fix the salary of the chief executive officer. Subject to the approval of the directors, the chief executive officer shall determine the terms of employment, tenure, duties, working conditions, promotion and termination of all other employees which the chief executive officer determines are necessary to carry out the purposes and functions of the council. Employees of the council shall be covered by the Wyoming Retirement Act, the State Employees and Officials Group Insurance Act and the Wyoming Deferred Compensation Act.

Upon termination of the council, all its rights and properties shall pass to and be vested in the state.

The council shall determine the date, time, place and method of notice for all regular meetings of the council. A majority of the voting directors of the council constitutes a quorum for the transaction of any business or the exercise of any power or function of the council. Matters shall be decided by a majority vote of the voting members of the council. As unanimously determined by the council members, the council may take action by conference telephone or similar communications equipment whereby all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other at the same time.

The council may execute and maintain at its expense a blanket surety bond covering each director, the chief executive officer and the employees or other officers of the council in the penal sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00).

The council may also form committees and advisory councils, which may include representatives who are not members of the board, to undertake more extensive study and discussion of the issues before the board. The council shall form an advisory council for broadband development and designate a broadband coordinator in accordance with W.S.

9-12-1509

.

Except as specifically provided in this act, the following provisions do not apply to the council:

W.S.

9-2-1001

.1 through

9-2-1014

.2 and

9-2-3201

through

9-2-3209

;

W.S.

9-3-101

through

9-3-105

;

The Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Except as specifically provided in this act, the provisions of W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

and

16-4-401

through

16-4-408

shall apply to the council.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 14, § 1; 2005, ch. 194, § 2; 2007, ch. 6, § 1; 2012, ch. 30, § 3; 2018 ch. 126, § 2, effective March 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “16-4-408” for “16-4-407” in (h).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, deleted the first sentence in (c) which read: “The council shall exist until July 1, 2008.”

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “9-2-1026” for “9-2-1026.1” in (g)(i).

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2018 amendment,

in (f), added the last sentence.

Laws 2018, ch. 126, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 56, § 3, in (g)(i), substituted "9-2-1001.1" for "9-2-1001" and "9-2-1014.2 and

9-2-3201

through

9-2-3209

" for "9-2-1026."

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2022, in the third sentence of (a), added "Beginning March 1, 2022," at the beginning, substituted "thirteen (13)" for "fifteen (15)" and made a related change.

Wyoming Retirement Act. —

See §

9-3-401

et seq.

State Employers and Official Group Insurance Act. —

See §

9-3-201

et seq.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 13-3-101(a), (b)(vi).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-12-102(a)(viii).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2009, ch. 199, § 1, provides: “There is appropriated one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000.00) from the general fund to the Wyoming business council, community development block grant account. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of funding planning grants under the community development block grant program for existing or proposed new long-term care facilities. For purposes of this act, “long-term care facilities” means a facility providing long-term care services as defined in W.S. 9-2-1302(a)(v). Grants funded under this act shall meet any other requirements of the community development block grant program provided under rules of the business council. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010.”

§ 9-12-104.
General powers and duties of the council.

Except as otherwise limited by this act, the council may:

Sue and be sued and procure necessary liability insurance;

Have a seal;

Make and execute contracts and other instruments;

Adopt rules and regulations to implement the programs and functions assigned to the council by this act. Any rule adopted by the council shall be submitted to the management council of the legislature in accordance with W.S.

28-9-101

through

28-9-108

, approved by the governor as provided in W.S. 16-3-103(d) and filed with the secretary of state;

Acquire or contract to acquire by grant, purchase, option or otherwise, real, personal or mixed property or any interest in property, including patents, copyrights, trademarks or any other evidence of protection or exclusivity as to products;

Own, hold, clear, improve and rehabilitate, and sell, assign, exchange, transfer, convey, lease and mortgage real, personal or mixed property or otherwise dispose of, or encumber the same;

Grant options to purchase any interest in or asset arising out of an agreement;

Provide advisory, consultative or educational services, technical assistance and advice to any person in order to carry out the purposes of the council;

Mortgage or pledge any or all of its revenue, income, or interest in or asset arising out of a venture agreement;

Except as otherwise provided in this act, deposit any funds of the council in any financial institutions located within the state;

Procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property and other assets and operations in amounts and from insurers it deems desirable;

Engage the services of consultants on a contract basis for rendering professional, financial and technical assistance and advice, including for studies and investigation likely to lead to business development. The procurement of the professional services of architects, engineers and surveyors shall be in accordance with W.S. 9-23-105(f) through (h) and 9-23-106(g);

Contract for and accept any gifts or grants or loans of funds or property or financial or other aid in any form from the federal government or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or from any other source and pass through or otherwise comply, subject to the provisions of this chapter, with the terms and conditions thereof;

Enter into agreements with persons doing business or who will do business in this state for the advancement of financial assistance to those persons for research and the development of specific products, procedures and techniques to be developed and produced in this state conditioned upon contractual assurances that the benefits of increasing or maintaining employment and tax revenues shall remain in and accrue to this state;

Consent to the modification of the terms of any mortgage, loan or contract to which the council is a party;

Organize, conduct, sponsor or cooperate in and assist the conduct of special institutes, conferences and demonstrations relating to the stimulation and formulation of business development;

Make investments in projects that have potential to stimulate economic development in the state;

Render advice and assistance and to provide services to state agencies, local and regional economic development entities, private firms and other persons providing services or facilities for economic development in Wyoming;

Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers granted to it by this act or any other act;

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 6, § 2.

The board, consistent with this act, shall develop guidelines for each of the areas specified in subsection (a) of this section relative to definitions, types of grants or loans, level of funding and repayment requirements.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 2; 2007, ch. 73, § 2; 2008, ch. 6, § 2; 2010, ch. 69, § 204; 2020 ch. 30, § 1, effective October 1, 2020.

The 2007 amendment,

added (a)(xxi).

Laws 2007, ch. 73, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 21, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

repealed former (a)(xxi), which read: “Administer the film industry financial incentive program as provided in W.S.

9-12-402

through 9-12-406.”

Laws 2008, ch. 6, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2008.

The 2010 amendment,

repealed former (a)(xx), which read: “Provide a program for severance pay and other transitional employment services to employees of the department of commerce who lost their employment with the state of Wyoming due to this act and who are not reemployed with the council within sixty (60) days of having their employment terminated with the department of commerce.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective October 1, 2020, in (a)(xii) added the second sentence.

§ 9-12-105.
Economic development services.

It shall be the duty of the council to encourage, stimulate and support the development and expansion of the economy of the state. The council is charged with the following duties and responsibilities:

To see that there are prepared and carried out effective economic development and diversification marketing and promotional programs;

To make available, in conjunction and cooperation with localities, chambers of commerce, industrial authorities and other public and private groups, to prospective new businesses basic information and pertinent factors of interest and concern to such businesses;

To formulate, promulgate and advance programs throughout the state for encouraging the location of new businesses in the state and the retention and growth of existing businesses;

To encourage and solicit private sector involvement, support and funding for economic development in the state;

To encourage the coordination of the economic development and diversification efforts of public institutions, regions, communities and private industry and collect and maintain data on the development and utilization of economic development and diversification capabilities;

To establish such offices within and without the state that are necessary to the expansion and development of industries and trade. The council shall establish economic development and diversification regions and offices within the state based upon socioeconomic and geographic similarities;

To encourage the export of products and services from the state to national and international markets. In addition to conducting international and other market research as authorized in W.S. 9-12-106(b), the council shall employ or contract with persons for purposes of developing new markets and expanding foreign trade efforts, including expanding international markets for Wyoming services, Wyoming agricultural and other products and commodities, and targeted consumer advertising;

To advise the University of Wyoming and the Wyoming community college commission in designating technical training and other educational programs in Wyoming’s community colleges and the University of Wyoming beneficial to economic development and diversification activities in this state;

To adopt a state broadband enhancement plan.

The council, in consultation with the coordinator of economic diversification, shall implement the “startup:Wyoming” program in priority economic sectors identified in the approved twenty (20) year comprehensive economic diversification strategy under W.S. 9-12-1402(a)(iv). The program shall:

Foster connectivity between entrepreneurs, investors and mentors, aligning local entities through coordinated points of contact in participating Wyoming communities. The efforts shall include methods of communication designed to allow interaction between stakeholders on a regular and consistent basis;

Provide entrepreneurs with advanced resources to help their business succeed, including mentoring, marketing, legal and other business coaching services;

In conjunction with the University of Wyoming, community colleges, localities, chambers of commerce, industrial authorities and other public and private groups, develop incubators, accelerators, co-working spaces, makerspaces and other unique work spaces and equipment to foster entrepreneurialism.

The council shall administer a “kickstart:Wyoming” program to provide funding to early stage ventures of Wyoming based entrepreneurs. Funding under this subsection shall be provided upon approval of the council. The council shall adopt rules for funding under this subsection in consultation with the coordinator of economic diversification. Funding shall be in amounts ranging from five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) and be provided under the following conditions:

To individuals who reside in Wyoming and to business entities which are, or agree in writing to be, headquartered in Wyoming and organized under the laws of the state of Wyoming and which:

Have committed to maintaining a meaningful nexus to the state of Wyoming, including after commercialization of a service, product, concept, design or any other marketable asset developed with the assistance of the funds;

Proposes a service, product, concept, design or any other marketable asset which has a probability of providing an economic return to the state of Wyoming through creation of jobs, expanded tax base and diversification of the state’s economy;

Agree to provide a report to the council on the progress to commercialize the service, product, concept, design or any other marketable asset developed with the assistance of the funds.

The recipient of funding meets other requirements established by rule of the council to ensure adequate consideration for the amount of the funding provided. In establishing provisions for adequate consideration to the state, the council may include, but is not limited to, requiring a recipient to seek additional nonstate investment funding and specifying requirements for maintaining a nexus to the state.

The council shall administer a small business innovation research matching program in accordance with this subsection. The program shall match federal funds approved for Wyoming based companies as provided in this subsection. The program shall be administered by the council in consultation with the University of Wyoming research office. The following shall apply to the program under this subsection:

To be eligible to receive funding, an entity shall:

Be headquartered in Wyoming and organized under the laws of the state of Wyoming;

Maintain a meaningful nexus to the state of Wyoming, including for not less than three (3) years after commercialization of a service, product, concept, design or any other marketable asset developed with the assistance of funds from the program;

Have received funding under the federal small business innovation research and small business technology transfer programs;

Propose a service, product, concept, design or any other marketable asset which has a probability of providing an economic return to the state of Wyoming through creation of jobs, expanded tax base and diversification of the state’s economy;

Agree to provide a report to the council on or before July 1 of each year in the following manner:

Prior to commercialization, the entity shall report on the progress of the entity to commercialize the service, product, concept, design or any other marketable asset developed with the assistance of funds from this program;

If the entity commercializes a service, product, concept, design or any other marketable asset, and continues to market the product, concept or design or asset, the entity shall report for three (3) years on:

The number of jobs the entity has created;

A salary range per job;

The taxable assets of the entity;

All revenues from sales of the service, product, concept, design or any other marketable asset of the entity.

Comply with the requirements of rules adopted pursuant to this subsection.

Matching funds shall be awarded to recipients as determined by the council in an amount not to exceed:

For a recipient of a phase I award, a match up to one hundred percent (100%) of the award, not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00);

For a recipient of a phase II award, a match up to one hundred percent (100%) of the award, not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00).

Matching funds under this subsection shall be awarded to the recipient as soon as practicable after approval of the matching fund application;

An entity shall repay all matching funds provided under this subsection plus interest at the rate of four percent (4%) per annum compounded annually from the date the matching funds were granted if:

The entity commercializes a service, product, concept, design or any other marketable asset developed with the assistance of funds from this program; and

The entity fails to maintain a significant nexus with the state of Wyoming within three (3) years of commercializing a service, product, concept, design or any other marketable asset developed with the assistance of funds from this program and continues to market the service, product, concept, design or asset.

The council shall adopt rules for the program in consultation with the coordinator of economic diversification. The rules shall include but not be limited to:

Application procedures;

The number of awards and amount of funds available for award in any fiscal year;

Timing of issuance of funds awarded under the program;

Eligibility requirements;

Provision for repayment of matching funds plus interest as provided in this subsection;

Provision for service, product, concept, design or asset review and requirements under the program consistent with this subsection;

Provisions to ensure adequate consideration for the amount of the funding provided. The council may include, but is not limited to, assessment of those items specified in W.S. 9-12-1405(b)(i) through (iv), specifying the allowable use of funds, requiring a recipient to seek additional nonstate investment funding and requiring the recipient to conduct its research in Wyoming to the extent practical.

Not later than October 15, 2018 and every October 15 thereafter, the council shall report to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee concerning the programs under subsections (c) and (d) of this section. The report shall include:

A yearly and total summary of the number and amounts of matching funds awarded under each program;

A description of an entity and a service, product, concept, design or any other marketable asset developed which was commercialized with the assistance of funds from these programs within the prior three (3) years;

The realized economic impact of each program on the state, including jobs created, salary range per job created and potential impact to the local community.

As used in this section, “commercialization” means the creation by an entity of commercial processes, products and services derived in whole or in part from research undertaken with matching funds awarded under subsection (c) or (d) of this section, which results in realized revenues to the entity of at least three (3) times the matching funds awarded under this section.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 2; 2018 ch. 125, § 1, effective March 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 126, § 2, effective March 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 127, § 2, effective March 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 125, § 1, in (a)(vii), added the second sentence and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2018, ch. 125, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 126, § 2, added (a)(ix) and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2018, ch. 126, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

The third 2018 amendment, by ch. 127, § 2, inserted “and diversification” following “economic development” throughout (a); and added (b) through (f).

Laws 2018, ch. 127, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

This section
is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (d)(v)(G), substituted "W.S. 9-12-1405(b)(i) through (iv)" for "9-12-408(b)(i) through (iv)."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-12-106.
Planning and research.

It shall also be the duty of the council to:

Develop a comprehensive economic development strategy for the state, starting the first year of each new gubernatorial administration, consistent with the provisions of this act; and

Conduct such studies and research, in collaboration with state agencies, university and community colleges, local and regional industrial authorities and organizations, and other persons within and without the state, as the council may deem necessary, to assist in the development of the comprehensive economic strategy and the development of recommendations and advice on the improvement of economic development and related programs and strategies across the state.

The council may establish a Wyoming market research center to conduct regional, national and international market research for Wyoming small businesses and potential entrepreneurs and to conduct market feasibility studies for value added projects across all economic sectors, including agriculture. The center may utilize the services of student interns from the University of Wyoming and community colleges to provide those students with practical marketing experience.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 20, § 2.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 2; 2011, ch. 20, §§ 1, 2.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), substituted “small businesses and potential entrepreneurs” for “manufacturers,” substituted the last sentence for “If a center is formed:”; and repealed former (b)(i) and (b)(ii) pertaining to requirements for fees and commissions to the center and for the center to become self-sufficient.

§ 9-12-107.
Tourism promotion and development.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 5, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 8, § 2.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 2; 2003, ch. 8, § 2; 2007, ch. 5, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, repealed former (a), regarding the duties of the council in distribution of information, cooperation between public and private agencies and implementing programs to promote tourism.

Tourism board. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 85, as amended by Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 2, creates the Wyoming tourism board within the Wyoming business council. The board is to be composed of nine members, to be appointed by the governor, employed in or associated with the travel industry. The board is responsible for implementing the tourism program and functions assigned to the Wyoming business council under the Wyoming economic development act, including the expenditure of all funds appropriated for this program. The tourism board is to exist until June 30, 2006, at which time its powers will be vested in the Wyoming business council.

Laws 2005, ch. 191 § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

Hunting segment issues study. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 338, as added by Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 4, appropriates $16,000 from the general fund to the legislative service office for the task force on current issues in the hunting segment of the tourism industry in the state to study issues and propose legislation relating to the pricing and availability of nonresident hunting licenses, including the effects of and potential solutions to current license allocation litigation, regulation of and issues of concern to the outfitting industry in the state and preference point systems for allocation of resident hunting licenses. The committee is to report to the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee on its findings and recommendations for statutory changes not later than October 1, 2005.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved on March 3, 2005.

§ 9-12-108.
Coordination of business permits.

The council shall:

Compile information on the federal, state and local requirements necessary to begin and operate a business in Wyoming and make this information available to the public on request;

Develop application procedures to expedite the state licensing and permitting process;

Assist prospective businesses in obtaining the necessary federal, state and local permits and licenses;

Encourage and facilitate the participation of federal, state and local government agencies in permit and license coordination;

Review permit requirements and the value to the state of these permits and prepare recommendations for changes for submission to the appropriate agency, the governor and the legislature.

The council may request assistance from any state agency to carry out its duties under this section. State agencies shall cooperate with the request for assistance.

The Wyoming business council shall prepare and present to the economically needed diversity options for Wyoming (ENDOW) executive council a proposal under which the business council, by exercising the duties and authority provided in this section, will assist businesses within the state in priority economic sectors identified in the approved twenty (20) year comprehensive economic diversification strategy under W.S. 9-12-1402(a)(iv) in obtaining necessary state, local and federal permits and licenses. The business council shall consult with businesses within Wyoming to identify specific federal, state and local regulations which unduly impede or delay permitting and licensing in the state and shall identify those regulations recommended for review by the entity with jurisdiction to eliminate unnecessary provisions. The business council proposals shall be submitted to the ENDOW executive council not later than July 1, 2018. The ENDOW executive council shall include recommendations for implementation of the business council proposals in its twenty (20) year comprehensive economic diversification strategy plan submitted pursuant to W.S. 9-12-1402(a)(iv) and in its first action plan under W.S. 9-12-1402(a)(v).

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 2; 2018 ch. 127, § 2, effective March 14, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

added (c).

Laws 2018, ch. 127, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.